Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2860
Temporary educational permit.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue to all qualified graduates of accredited colleges of pharmacy, who are eligible for the examination provided for in section 38-2851, and who make application for such examination, a temporary educational permit. Such permit shall be issued only for the duration of the time between the date of the examination and the date of licensure granted as a result of such examination.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 40;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.27;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 956.